District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.31

Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Anacostia Waterfront Environmental Standards Act of 2008”.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 451, 55 DCR 1689

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-301.181 and § 2-1225.21.

Temporary Addition of Section

D.C. Law 17-53, § 402, added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 402. Environmental standards.
“The Mayor shall continue to maintain and apply the environmental standards adopted by the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Board of Directors on June 1, 2007, to all of the properties, projects, initiatives, and developments within the Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone.”
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 402 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-71, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7390).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 402 of National Capitol Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-152, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10900).